Nebraska, session 109, LB56.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB56 LB56
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-6,102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
60-6,102 (1) In the case of a driver who dies within four hours
after being in a motor vehicle accident, including a motor vehicle
accident in which one or more persons in addition to such driver is
killed, and of a pedestrian sixteen years of age or older who dies within
four hours after being struck by a motor vehicle, the coroner or other
official performing the duties of coroner shall examine the body and
cause such tests to be made as are necessary to determine the amount of
alcohol or drugs in the body of such driver or pedestrian.
(2) Such information shall be included in each report submitted
pursuant to sections 60-6,101 to 60-6,104 and shall be tabulated on a
monthly basis by the Department of Transportation. Such information,
including the identity of the deceased and any such amount of alcohol or
drugs, shall be public information and may be released or disclosed as
provided by the department.
(3) A medical facility or mortuary shall comply with a request from
a peace officer for a blood draw of a driver or pedestrian described in
subsection (1) of this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 60-6,102, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-